Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 7. Eminent Domain by Urban Renewal Authorities - Vesting

38-7-101.
Motion for vesting - contents.

In any proceeding initiated by an urban renewal authority, as defined in section 31-25-103, C.R.S., under the provisions of article 1 of this title, the petitioner or any respondent, at any time after the petition has been filed and before judgment is entered in the proceeding, may file a written verified motion requesting that, immediately or at some specified later date, the petitioner be vested with fee simple title, or some lesser estate, interest, or easement, as may be required, to the real property, or a specified portion thereof, which is the subject of the proceeding, and be authorized to take possession of and use such property. Any motion filed by any respondent shall affect, and be limited in application to, the property in which the said respondent has an interest. All the owners of property must join in any motion filed by any respondent under this section, unless one or more of the owners of record cannot by due diligence be found, in which instance this fact shall be stated in the motion.

The motion described in subsection (1) of this section, referred to in this article as the “motion for vesting”, shall set forth:

An accurate description of the property to which the motion relates and the estate or interest sought to be acquired or divested; but, in any motion for vesting filed by any respondent, the interest sought to be divested shall be the interest described in the petition in eminent domain; and

The names of the owners of record of the property described in the motion for vesting; and

The date upon which it is requested that the estate or interest sought to be acquired or divested shall vest in the petitioner and the date upon which it is requested that the petitioner shall be entitled to possession and use of the subject property.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

P. 357, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-7-1.

38-7-102.
Motion for vesting - procedure with respect thereto.

The court shall set a date, not less than twenty-one days after the filing of such motion, for the hearing thereon, and the court shall require at least fourteen days’ notice to be given to each party to the proceeding whose interests would be affected by the taking requested. The averments in the motion and the necessity for the vesting of title, or some lesser estate, prior to the final determination of just compensation are deemed admitted unless such averments are controverted in a responsive pleading filed at or before the hearing on the motion for vesting.

At the hearing on the motion for vesting, if such averments have been controverted in responsive pleadings filed at or before the said hearing and if the court has not previously, in the same proceeding, determined the same, the court shall first hear and determine the following matters:

The authority of the petitioner to exercise the right of eminent domain;

Whether the property described in the motion for vesting is subject to the exercise of the right of eminent domain;

Whether the right of eminent domain is being properly exercised in the particular proceeding.

Failure to raise the issues enumerated in subsection (2) of this section, at or before the hearing on the motion for vesting, constitutes a waiver insofar as the said issues relate to the property described in the motion for vesting. The court’s order thereon is a final order, and an appeal may be obtained for the review thereof by either party within twenty-one days after the entry of such order, but not thereafter unless the appellate court, on good cause shown, shall, within the twenty-one-day period, extend the time for obtaining an appeal. Appellate review shall not stay the other proceedings under this article, unless the appeal was obtained by the petitioner or unless an order staying such further proceedings is entered by the appellate court upon a showing of irreparable injury.

If the issues enumerated under subsection (2) of this section are determined in favor of the petitioner and further proceedings are not stayed or if further proceedings are stayed and the appeal results in a determination in favor of the petitioner, the court shall hear and determine all matters raised in and relating to the motion for vesting. If the foregoing matters are determined in favor of the petitioner, the court shall appoint three disinterested commissioners, who shall be freeholders, to assess the compensation to which the respondents named in the motion for vesting may be entitled by reason of the appropriation of the petitioner.

The commissioners, before entering upon the duties of their office, shall take an oath to faithfully and impartially discharge their duties as commissioners. Any one of them may administer oaths to witnesses produced before them. The commissioners shall forthwith view the property, hear such testimony, and consider such evidence as is reasonably necessary to enable them to make a preliminary finding of an amount constituting just compensation for the taking of the property of the respondents named in the motion for vesting. The commissioners shall forthwith make, subscribe, and file with the clerk of the court in which such proceedings are had a certified report meeting the requirements of section 38-1-115. Upon the motion of the petitioner filed within fourteen days of receipt of the notice provided for in section 38-7-103 (1), the court shall review the said report of the commissioners, and, upon good cause shown by the petitioner, the court may order a new report by the same or different commissioners, and the said order shall void the report objected to. The new commissioners appointed, if any, and the new report shall be in accordance with the provisions of this article.

Such preliminary finding of just compensation and any deposit made or security provided pursuant thereto shall not be evidence in the further proceedings to ascertain finally the just compensation to be paid and shall not be disclosed in any manner to a jury impaneled in such proceedings.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

P. 358, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-7-2.

L. 2014:

(1), (3), and (5) amended,(HB 14-1347), ch. 208, p. 769, § 4, effective July 1.

38-7-103.
Vesting of title - procedure.

When the certified report of the commissioners is filed with the clerk of the court, the said clerk shall forthwith notify all parties named in the motion for vesting of the filing of the said report and of the amount preliminarily found to constitute just compensation.

Within seven days of receipt of the notice described in subsection (1) of this section, the petitioner shall deposit with the court or the clerk of the court, for the use of the respondent named in the motion for vesting, the sum of money preliminarily found to constitute just compensation by the commissioners. If the petitioner has filed a motion for a new report under section 38-7-102 (5), the deposit shall not be due until seven days following the court’s ruling on the said motion, if the motion is denied. If the motion is granted by the court, a new notice shall be sent by the clerk upon receipt of the new report.

Upon payment into the court or the clerk of the court of the sum described in subsection (2) of this section by the petitioner, the court shall enter an order vesting in the petitioner the fee simple title, or such lesser estate, interest, or easement, as may be required, to the property as requested in the motion for vesting at such date as the court considers proper, and fixing a date on which the petitioner is authorized to take possession of and to use the property. A certified copy of said order shall be recorded and indexed in the recorder’s office of the county in which the property is located in like manner and with like effect as if it were a deed of conveyance from the owners and parties interested to the proper parties. If there is more than one person interested as owner or otherwise in the property and they are unable to agree upon the nature, extent, or value of their respective interests in the total amount of compensation so ascertained and assessed on an undivided basis, the nature, extent, or value of said interests shall be determined according to law in a separate and subsequent proceeding and distribution made among the several claimants.

At the request of any affected party and upon his showing of undue hardship or other good cause, the petitioner’s authority to take possession of the property shall be postponed for more than fourteen days after the date of such vesting of title or more than twenty-one days after the entry of such order when the order does not vest title in the petitioner. If postponement occurs, such party shall pay to the petitioner a reasonable rental for such property, the amount thereof to be determined by the court.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

P. 359, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-7-3.

L. 2014:

(2) and (4) amended, (HB 14-1347), ch. 208, p. 769, § 5, effective July 1.

38-7-104.
Withdrawals from deposit.

Upon proper application to the court or by stipulation between the parties, the respondent may withdraw from the sum deposited pursuant to section 38-7-103 (2) an amount not to exceed three-fourths of the highest valuation evidenced by testimony presented by the petitioner to the commissioners, unless the petitioner agrees to a larger withdrawal. All parties interested in the property sought to be acquired shall be required to consent and agree to any such withdrawal. Any such withdrawal of said deposit shall be a partial payment of the amount of total compensation to be paid and shall be deducted by the clerk of the court from any award or verdict entered thereafter. Any party making such withdrawal shall refund to the clerk of the court, upon the entry of a proper court order, any portion of the amount so withdrawn which exceeds the amount finally ascertained in the proceeding to be just compensation or damages, costs, or expenses owing to such party.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

P. 360, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-7-4.

38-7-105.
Construction of article.

The right to take possession and title prior to the final judgment as prescribed in this article is in addition to any other right, power, or authority otherwise conferred by law and shall not be construed as abrogating, limiting, or modifying any such other right, power, or authority, including the rights, powers, and authorities granted in articles 1 to 6 of this title. Should the provisions of this article be invoked by any party, the final determination of the amount constituting just compensation shall be determined pursuant to the provisions of article 1 of this title.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

P. 360, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-7-5.

38-7-106.
Commissioners - other articles.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent a commissioner appointed under this article from being appointed pursuant to the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title in the same eminent domain proceeding. Nothing in this article shall prevent the appointment of a commissioner, for purposes of this article, who has previously been appointed in the same proceeding under the provisions of article 1 of this title.

History.

Source:
L. 69:

P. 360, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-7-6.

38-7-107.
Interest.

The petitioner shall pay interest as provided in section 38-1-116; except that no interest shall be allowed on that portion of the award which the respondent received or could have received as a partial payment by withdrawal from the sum deposited by the petitioner pursuant to section 38-7-103 (2).

History.

Source:
L. 69:

P. 360, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 50-7-7.